District of Columbia statutes.
42-2507

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules within 90 days after the effective date of this chapter to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The rules shall include the following:

(1)

An application procedure for the Program;

(2)

A standard for eligibility and selection of applicants; and

(3)

The conditions under which the deferred payment loan may be granted.

(c)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-96, § 8, 47 DCR 1081
Resolution 14-578, the “Government Employer-Assisted Housing Program Teacher, Police Officer, and Firefighter Hiring Incentive Regulations Approval Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective October 18, 2002.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 8 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-258, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1124).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 8 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-188, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10407).